District of Columbia statutes.
21-2211

Limitations.

No person authorized to act pursuant to § 21-2210 shall have the power:

(1)

To consent to an abortion, sterilization or psycho-surgery, unless authorized by a court; or

(2)

To consent to convulsive therapy or behavior modification programs involving aversive stimuli, unless authorized by a court.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-189, § 12, 35 DCR 8653
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 23(l), 40 DCR 6311
1981 Ed., § 21-2211.
This section is referenced in § 7-1231.07.